Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.49.125

Resulting bank has branches inside and outside of state—Application—Definitions—Combination or purchase and assumption requires director's approval—Deposit concentration limits.

(1) This section is applicable where the resulting bank would have branches inside and outside the state of Washington.

(2) As used in this section, unless a different meaning is required by the context, the following words and phrases have the following meanings:

(a) "Combination" means a merger or consolidation, or purchase or sale of all or substantially all of the assets, including all or substantially all of the branches.

(b) "Out-of-state bank" means a bank, as defined in 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1813(a), which is chartered under the laws of any state other than this state, or a national bank, the main office of which is located in any state other than this state.

(c) "State" means any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, any territory of the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, the Virgin Islands, and the Northern Mariana Islands.

(3) A bank chartered under this title may engage in a combination or purchase and assumption of one or more branches of an out-of-state bank with an out-of-state bank with the prior approval of the director if the combination or purchase and assumption would result in a bank chartered under this title. Upon notice to the director a bank chartered under this title and an out-of-state bank may engage in a combination if the combination would result in an out-of-state bank. However, that combination shall comply with applicable Washington law as determined by the director, including but not limited to applicable state merger laws, and the conditions and requirements of this section.

(4) Applications for the director's approval under subsection (3) of this section shall be on a form prescribed by the director and conditioned upon payment of a fee prescribed pursuant to RCW 30A.04.070. If the director finds that (a) the proposed combination will not be detrimental to the safety and soundness of the applicant or the resulting bank, (b) any new officers and directors of the resulting bank are qualified by character, experience, and financial responsibility to direct and manage the resulting bank, and (c) the proposed merger is consistent with the convenience and needs of the communities to be served by the resulting bank in this state and is otherwise in the public interest, the director shall approve the interstate combination and the operation of branches outside of Washington by the applicant bank. This transaction may be consummated only after the applicant has received evidence of the director's written approval.

(5) Any out-of-state bank that will be the resulting bank pursuant to an interstate combination involving a bank chartered under this title shall notify the director of the proposed combination not later than three days after the date of filing of an application for the combination with the responsible federal bank supervisory agency, and shall submit a copy of that application to the director and pay applicable filing fees, if any, required by the director. In lieu of notice from the proposed resulting bank the director may accept notice from the bank's supervisory agency having primary responsibility for the bank. The director shall have the authority to waive any procedures required by Washington merger laws if the director finds that the procedures are in conflict with applicable federal law or in conflict with the applicable law of the state of the resulting bank.

(6) Subject to RCW 30A.38.010(2), the deposit concentration limits stated in 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1831u(b)(2)(B) shall apply to the combination of an out-of-state bank and a nonaffiliated out-of-state bank or bank organized under this title or under the national bank act if the combination is an interstate merger transaction.

(7) A combination resulting in the acquisition, by an out-of-state bank that does not have branches in this state, of a bank organized under this title or the national bank act, shall not be permitted under this chapter unless the bank to be acquired, or its predecessors, have been in continuous operation, on the date of the combination, for a period of at least five years.

[ 2014 c 37 s 255; 1996 c 2 s 9. Formerly RCW 30.49.125.]

NOTES: